New York, session 2025-2026, S7042.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 250.73 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 250.73 Unlawful possession of a patient record. 4 A person is guilty of unlawful possession of a patient record when the 5 person obtains a patient record without legal authority, or receives a 6 patient record that was disclosed to such person without legal authori- 7 ty, and intentionally disregards a written demand by a health care 8 provider that lawfully possessed such record, or by the patient who is 9 the subject of such record, to return or destroy the record. For the 10 purpose of this section, "patient record" shall mean patient information 11 as defined in section eighteen of the public health law that is in writ- 12 ten or electronic form, and "person" does not include a covered entity 13 within the meaning of HIPAA regulations. 14 Unlawful possession of a patient record is a class A misdemeanor. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 16 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11324-01-5